Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-4,100
Highway Cash Fund; Roads Operations Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Highway Cash Fund and the Roads Operations Cash Fund are hereby created. If bonds are issued pursuant to subsection (2) of section 39-2223, the balance of the share of the Highway Trust Fund allocated to the Department of Transportation and deposited into the Highway Restoration and Improvement Bond Fund as provided in subsection (8) of section 39-2215 and the balance of the money deposited in the Highway Restoration and Improvement Bond Fund as provided in section 39-2215.01 shall be transferred by the State Treasurer, on or before the last day of each month, to the Highway Cash Fund. If no bonds are issued pursuant to subsection (2) of section 39-2223, the share of the Highway Trust Fund allocated to the Department of Transportation shall be transferred by the State Treasurer on or before the last day of each month to the Highway Cash Fund.

The Legislature may direct the State Treasurer to transfer funds from the Highway Cash Fund to the Roads Operations Cash Fund. Both funds shall be expended by the department (1) for acquiring real estate, road materials, equipment, and supplies to be used in the construction, reconstruction, improvement, and maintenance of state highways, (2) for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, and maintenance of state highways, including grading, drainage, structures, surfacing, roadside development, landscaping, and other incidentals necessary for proper completion and protection of state highways as the department shall, after investigation, find and determine shall be for the best interests of the highway system of the state, either independent of or in conjunction with federal-aid money for highway purposes, (3) for the share of the department of the cost of maintenance of state aid bridges, (4) for planning studies in conjunction with federal highway funds for the purpose of analyzing traffic problems and financial conditions and problems relating to state, county, township, municipal, federal, and all other roads in the state and for incidental costs in connection with the federal-aid grade crossing program for roads not on state highways, (5) for tests and research by the department or proportionate costs of membership, tests, and research of highway organizations when participated in by the highway departments of other states, (6) for the payment of expenses of the Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards as set forth in the County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act and sections 39-2101 to 39-2125, (7) for support of the public transportation assistance program established under section 13-1209 and the intercity bus system assistance program established under section 13-1213, (8) for purchasing from political or governmental subdivisions or public corporations, pursuant to section 39-1307, any federal-aid transportation funds available to such entities, (9) for costs related to the administration of the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation as specified in section 3-107, (10) for furnishing the Nebraska Broadband Office with necessary office space, furniture, equipment, and supplies as well as providing administrative and budgetary support, including salaries for professional, technical, and clerical assistants, as provided in section 81-702, and (11) for the County Bridge Match Program.

Any money in the Highway Cash Fund and the Roads Operations Cash Fund not needed for current operations of the department shall, as directed by the Director-State Engineer to the State Treasurer, be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, subject to approval by the board of each investment. All income received as a result of such investment shall be placed in the Highway Cash Fund.

Laws 1937, c. 148, § 4, p. 570;

Laws 1939, c. 84, § 2, p. 363;

Laws 1941, c. 133, § 2, p. 525;

Laws 1941, c. 134, § 10, p. 536;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 66-411;

Laws 1943, c. 138, § 1(4), p. 472;

Laws 1943, c. 139, § 1(4), p. 479;

R.S.1943, § 66-424;

Laws 1947, c. 214, § 4, p. 698;

Laws 1953, c. 131, § 15, p. 410;

Laws 1965, c. 393, § 1, p. 1257;

Laws 1969, c. 530, § 3, p. 2171;

Laws 1971, LB 21, § 1;

Laws 1972, LB 1496, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 599, § 16;

Laws 1988, LB 632, § 19;

Laws 1990, LB 602, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-424;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 51;

Laws 1994, LB 1194, § 15;

Laws 2004, LB 1144, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB98, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB331, § 32;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 238;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 50;

Laws 2023, LB683, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 45;

Laws 2024, LB1030, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 25.
July 1, 2026
County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act, see section 39-2301.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.